Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1205.01
Licensed natural resources ground water technician, defined.

Licensed natural resources ground water technician means a natural resources ground water technician who has taken a training course, passed an examination based on the training course, and received a license from the department indicating that he or she is a licensed natural resources ground water technician.

Laws 2001, LB 133, § 4;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1148.